Wyoming statutes. Title 3 Guardian and Ward
Article 4. Miscellaneous Provisions

§ 3-9-401.
Uniformity of application and construction.

In applying and construing this uniform act, consideration shall be given to the need to promote uniformity of the law with respect to its subject matter among the states that enact it.

History.

2017 ch. 117, § 1, effective January 1, 2018.

Effective dates. —

Laws 2017, ch. 117, § 4, makes the act effective Jan. 1, 2018.

§ 3-9-402.
Relation to electronic signatures in global and national commerce act.

This act modifies, limits and supersedes the federal Electronic Signatures in Global and National Commerce Act, 15 U.S.C. section 7001 et seq., but does not modify, limit or supersede section 101(c) of that act, 15 U.S.C. section 7001(c), or authorize electronic delivery of any of the notices described in section 103(b) of that act, 15 U.S.C. section 7003(b).

History.

2017 ch. 117, § 1, effective January 1, 2018.

Effective dates. —

Laws 2017, ch. 117, § 4, makes the act effective Jan. 1, 2018.

§ 3-9-403.
Effect on existing powers of attorney.

Except as otherwise provided in this act, this act applies to a:

Power of attorney created before, on or after the effective date of this act;

Judicial proceeding concerning a power of attorney commenced on or after the effective date of this act;

Judicial proceeding concerning a power of attorney commenced before the effective date of this act unless the court finds that application of a provision of this act would substantially interfere with the effective conduct of the judicial proceeding or prejudice the rights of a party, in which case that provision does not apply and the superseded law applies.

Except as otherwise provided by this act, an act done before the effective date of this act is not affected by this act.

A power of attorney properly executed and valid on the effective date of this act shall remain valid and enforceable and shall be construed according to the terms contained therein and accepted and relied upon in accordance with the provisions of W.S.

3-9-119

.

A power of attorney created prior to the effective date of this act or existing on the effective date of this act is durable as determined pursuant to W.S.

3-9-104

and is otherwise construed and applied in accordance with this act.

History.

2017 ch. 117, § 1, effective January 1, 2018.

Effective dates. —

Laws 2017, ch. 117, § 4, makes the act effective Jan. 1, 2018.